Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1108.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 401 and 402(a) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 401. District Election Boards; Election.--All primaries and elections shall be conducted in each election district by a district election board consisting of a judge of 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 election, a majority inspector of election and a minority inspector of election, assisted by clerks and machine inspectors in certain cases, as hereinafter provided. The judge and inspectors of election of each election district shall be [elected by the electors thereof at the municipal election, and shall hold office for a term of four years from the first Monday of January next succeeding their election. Each elector may vote for one person as judge and for one person as inspector, and the person receiving the highest number of votes for judge shall be declared elected judge of election, the person receiving the highest number of votes for inspector shall be declared elected majority inspector of election, and the person receiving the second highest number of votes for inspector shall be declared elected minority inspector of election.] appointed by the county board of elections as provided in this article.Section 402. Qualifications of Election Officers.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), election officers shall be qualified registered electors of the district in which they are [elected or] appointed. No person shall be qualified to serve as an election officer who shall hold, or shall within two months have held, any office, appointment or employment in or under the Government of the United States or of this State or of any city or county or poor district, of any municipal board, commission or trust in any city, save only district justices, notaries public and persons in the militia service of the State; nor shall any election officer be eligible to any civil office to be voted for at a primary or election at which he shall serve[, except that of an election officer].* * *Section 2. Section 403 of the act is repealed:20250SB1108PN1364 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [Section 403. Tie Votes for Judge and Inspector.--If at any municipal election in any district there shall be a tie vote for the office of judge of election, the majority inspector of election elected at said election shall decide the tie vote. If at any municipal election in any district there is a tie vote for inspectors, the two candidates who receive the same number of votes shall determine by lot which of them shall be the majority inspector, and the other candidate shall be the minority inspector, and in case of a tie vote also for judge of election at said election, the tie shall be decided by the person so determined to be majority inspector. The county board shall be notified immediately upon the determination of any such tie vote.]Section 3. Section 405 heading, (a), (b) and (c) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 405. Vacancies in Election Boards; Appointment; Judge and Majority Inspector to Be Members of Majority Party; Minority Inspector to Be Member of Minority Party; Transition of Elected Officers.--(a) Vacancies in election boards existing by reason of the disqualification, removal, resignation or death of an election officer, or from any other cause, occurring prior to the fifth day before any primary or election, shall, in all cases, be filled by appointment, by the [court of the proper county] county board of elections, of competent persons, qualified in accordance with the provisions of this act[, who shall serve for the unexpired term of the person whose place he is appointed to fill]: Provided, however, That any district election officer who, after his election or appointment, changes his political affiliation, shall not thereby become disqualified 20250SB1108PN1364 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to serve on said election board, and shall not thereby be subject to removal. In making such appointments, the [court] board shall receive and consider any petitions filed by qualified electors of the district affected, and shall make no appointment to fill any vacancy unless notice of the time at which they will make such appointment shall have been posted on the polling place of such district, and in the immediate vicinity thereof, at least five days prior thereto. In the appointment of inspectors in any election district, both shall not be of the same political party at the time of said appointment, but one shall be of the party having the largest number of votes and the other shall be of the party having the second largest number of votes in said district at the last preceding November election, as nearly as the judge or judges can ascertain the fact. The judge of election shall, in all cases of appointment, be of the political party having the majority of votes in said district at the last preceding November election, as nearly as the judge or judges can ascertain the fact. [Immediately upon the entry of an order of court filling any vacancy on an election board, the clerk of said court shall forthwith transmit a certified copy of said order to the county board, giving the name and address of said appointee.] Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, in counties which have adopted home rule charters or optional plans and which appoint the members of the county election board under section 301(b), vacancies in the county board of elections shall be filled consistent with the provisions for appointment of county election board members under that section.* * *[(b) The first election board for any new district shall be 20250SB1108PN1364 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 selected, by the court of the proper county, of competent persons, qualified in accordance with the provisions of this act, who shall serve until the next municipal election at which all election officials are elected under the provisions of section 401.(c) Vacancies in election boards occurring at any time during the five days immediately preceding any primary or election or on the day of the primary or election may be filled by appointment by the county board of elections from a pool of competent persons who are qualified registered electors of the county and who have been trained by the county to perform the duties of election officers which are required by this act. Any person appointed to fill a vacancy in accordance with this subsection shall serve as a member of the election board on the day of the primary or election only. Any election board position filled in accordance with this subsection shall be deemed vacant on the day immediately following the primary or election and subsequently shall be filled in accordance with subsection (a).](d) Any person elected to a district election board prior to November 2, 2027, shall remain an officer of the district election board until the person is appointed by a county board of elections or replaced by another person in accordance with section 401.(e) No later than January 30, 2028, a county board of elections shall complete appointments to each district election board.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1108PN1364 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627